Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 13 Local Improvement Districts
§ 37-13-127.
Issuance of bonds.

After the expiration of thirty (30) days from the date of the adoption of the resolution levying the assessments, the governing body may issue negotiable interest-bearing bonds in a principal amount not exceeding the unpaid balance of the assessments levied. The bonds shall bear interest payable semiannually or annually and shall mature serially over a period not exceeding twenty (20) years, but in no event shall the bonds extend over a longer period of time than the period of time over which the installments of special assessments are due and payable and ninety (90) days thereafter. The bonds shall be of a form and denomination and shall be payable in principal and interest at times and places and shall be sold, authorized and issued in a manner, as the governing body may determine. The bonds shall be dated no earlier than the date on which the special assessment shall begin to bear interest and shall be secured by and payable from the irrevocable pledge of the funds derived from the levy and collection of the special assessments in anticipation of the collection of which they are issued. Any premium received on the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the fund for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds. The bonds shall be callable for redemption from the proceeds of the sale of property sold for the nonpayment of special assessments but not otherwise unless the bonds on the face thereof provide for redemption prior to maturity. The governing body may provide that the bonds shall be redeemable on interest payment date or dates prior to maturity pursuant to notice and at premiums as it deems advisable. The bonds shall be signed by a member of the governing body designated by the governing body and shall be countersigned by the city recorder or the clerk of the board of the town trustees or the clerk of the board of the county commissioners, whichever is applicable, and one (1) of the signatures may be a facsimile signature. Interest may be evidenced by interest coupons attached to the bonds and signed by a facsimile signature of one (1) of the individuals who signed the bond.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “times and places” for “times and place.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-13-128.
Errors or irregularities not to void assessment; civil action to adjudicate grievance; action to test validity of resolution authorizing bond issue.

No special assessment shall be declared void or set aside in consequence of any error or irregularity permitted or appearing in any of the proceedings under this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

], but any party feeling aggrieved by any special assessment or proceeding may bring a civil action to adjudicate the grievance if the action is commenced prior to the expiration of thirty (30) days after adoption of the assessment ordinance. Every person whose property is subject to the special assessment and who fails to appear during the public hearings on assessments to raise his objection to the tax shall be deemed to have waived all objection to the assessment except the objection that the governing body lacks jurisdiction to levy the tax, which objection must be raised within thirty (30) days after adoption of the assessment ordinance. Whenever any enactment authorizing the issuance of any bonds pursuant to the improvement contemplated is adopted, the resolution shall be published once in a newspaper in which the original notice of hearing was published. For twenty (20) days thereafter, any person whose property has been assessed and any taxpayer in the district may institute litigation for the purpose of questioning or attacking the legality of such bonds. After the expiration of twenty (20) days, all proceedings by the governing body, the bonds to be issued pursuant thereto, and the special assessments from which the bonds are to be paid, shall be final and no suit challenging the legality thereof may be instituted in this state, and no court shall have the authority to inquire into such matters.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-129.
Conversion costs.

In determining the conversion costs included in the costs and feasibility report, the public utility shall be entitled to amounts sufficient to repay the following, as computed and reflected by the uniform system of accounts approved by the Wyoming public service commission, federal power commission or federal communications commission, or in the event the public utility is not subject to regulation by any of the above governmental agencies, by the public utility’s system of accounts then in use and in accordance with standard accounting procedures of the public utility:

The recorded original costs less depreciation taken as of the date of the assessment resolution of the existing overhead electric and communication facilities to be removed;

The estimated costs of removing the overhead electric and communication facilities, less the salvage value of the facilities removed;

If the estimated cost of constructing underground facilities exceeds the recorded original cost of constructing aerial facilities, then the cost difference between the two; and

The cost of obtaining new easements, including all reasonable acquisition costs, when technical considerations make it reasonably necessary to utilize easements for the underground facilities different from those used for the aboveground facilities, or where the preexisting easements are insufficient for underground facilities.

If provision for payment of all or a portion of conversion cost by the affected public utility are included in tariffs, rules or regulations filed with or promulgated by the Wyoming public service commission, such conversion costs shall be the costs included in the costs and feasibility report and the rates and conditions of such tariff, rule or regulation shall also be applicable and binding on customers in the district.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-130.
Construction of and title to converted facilities.

The public utility concerned is responsible for all construction work involving its facilities and may contract out such of this construction work as it deems desirable. There shall be no competitive bidding as to the construction of the converted facilities since existing facilities are owned and operated by the public utility and the continuity of service of the public utility is essential. Title to the converted facilities is solely in the public utility involved. The public is only purchasing the intangible benefits which come from removal of the overhead facilities and replacement by underground facilities.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-131.
Conversion costs and service connections.

The public utility performing the conversion shall, at the expense of the property owner, convert to underground all electric and communication service facilities located upon any lot or parcel of land within the improvement district and not within the easement for distribution, sometimes referred to as “service drops” or “drop wires.” This shall include the digging and backfilling of a trench upon the lot or parcel unless the owner executes and files a written objection with the clerk of the governing body not later than the date set for hearing objections to the improvement district assessment as provided by law. Failure to file the written objection shall be taken as a consent and grant of easement to the utility and shall be construed as express authority to the public utility and their respective officers, agents and employees to enter upon the lot or parcel for such purpose, and through failure to object, any right of protest or objection in respect of the doing of such work shall be waived. If an owner does file the written objection, he shall be responsible for providing a trench in accordance with applicable rules, regulations or tariffs from the owner’s service entrance to a point designated by the public utility and for backfilling the trench following installation of the underground service by the public utility involved.

If conversion costs for the service facilities located upon any lot or parcel of land and not within the easement for distribution are included in tariffs, rules or regulations filed with or promulgated by the public service commission, the conversion costs shall be the costs included in the costs and feasibility report, and the property owner shall be obligated for that amount.

In any event the cost of any work done by the public utility shall be included in the assessment to be levied upon the lot or parcel. If a written objection is filed as above provided, the owner involved is obligated for and the public utility involved is entitled to payment for the actual cost for the work accomplished upon the owner’s property by the public utility.

The owner shall, at his expense, make all necessary changes in the service entrance equipment to accept underground service.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-132.
Notice of disconnection.

If the owner of any lot or parcel of land fails to make necessary changes in the service entrance equipment or fails to provide the trench in a timely manner, at the time the converted facilities are ready for connection to his property, the electric or communication service may be disconnected and removed and all overhead electric or communication facilities providing service to any building, structure or improvement located upon the lot or parcel may be disconnected. Written notice of disconnection shall be given at least ten (10) days prior to disconnection by leaving a copy of the notice at the principal building, structure or improvement located upon the lot or parcel.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-133.
Payment of public utility.

Upon completion of the conversion the public utility corporation shall present the governing body with its verified bill for conversion costs as computed pursuant to W.S.

37-13-129

or

37-13-131

of the statutes, but based upon the actual cost of constructing the underground facility rather than the estimated cost of the facility. In no event shall the bill for conversion cost presented by the public utility corporation exceed the amount of estimated conversion costs by the public utility corporation. If the conversion costs are less than the estimated conversion costs, each owner within the improvement district shall receive the benefit, prorated in such form and at such time or times as the governing body may determine to be fair and equitable. The bill of the public utility corporation shall be paid within thirty (30) days by the governing body from the improvement district funds or such other source as is properly designated by the governing body. In determining the actual cost of constructing the underground facility the public utility shall use its standard accounting procedures, such as the uniform system of accounts as defined by the federal communications commission, federal power commission or Wyoming public service commission in use at the time of the conversion.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

37-13-129

or

37-13-131

” for “sections 37-301 and 37-303”.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

§ 37-13-134.
Reinstallation of overhead facilities not permitted.

Once removed, no overhead electric or communication facilities shall be installed in a local improvement district for conversion of overhead electric and communication facilities.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-135.
No limitation of public service commission's jurisdiction.

Nothing contained in this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

] shall vest any jurisdiction over public utilities in the governing bodies. The public service commission of Wyoming shall retain all jurisdiction now or hereafter conferred upon it by law and no new jurisdiction shall be conferred upon this commission by virtue of this law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-136.
Nonseverability.

If any provision of this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

] is held invalid, such invalidity shall invalidate this chapter in its entirety, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be nonseverable.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-137.
Commencement of conversion.

If an improvement district is established pursuant to this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

], the public utility corporations involved shall not be required to commence conversion until the ordinance, the assessment roll and issuance of bonds have become final and no civil action has been filed or if civil action has been filed, until the decision of the court upon the action has become final and is not subject to further appeal.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.